Hawaii statutes.
[§305J-10] Reauthorization. (a) A private
college or university that is authorized pursuant to section 305J-8 and maintains its accreditation shall apply to the department for
reauthorization every two years. A private college or
university that has its accreditation reaffirmed without sanction and continues to demonstrate its compliance with section 305J-14, shall otherwise be presumed to be qualified
for reauthorization under this chapter for a period of two years.

(b)
A seminary or religious training institution authorized pursuant to section
305J-9 shall apply to the department for
reauthorization every two years. A seminary or
religious training institution that continues to meet the authorization
requirements of this chapter shall otherwise be presumed to
be qualified for reauthorization under this chapter for a period of two years.

(c)
Private colleges or universities, seminaries, and religious training institutions applying for reauthorization
under this section shall pay the fees required pursuant to section 305J-18.

(d) If a private college or university,
seminary, or religious training institution cannot demonstrate that it meets
the authorization requirements of this chapter, the director
shall deny the application for reauthorization. The director shall provide the private college or
university, seminary, or religious training institution with written
notification of the denial of the application for reauthorization and the basis
for the denial. If, within six months of receiving notice that its application
for reauthorization has been denied, the private college or university, seminary, or religious training institution corrects
the action or condition upon which the denial was based, it may reapply for
reauthorization. If the private college or
university, seminary, or religious training institution does not correct the
action or condition upon which the denial was based, it may submit a new
application for authorization pursuant to section 305J-8 or 305J-9, whichever is applicable, once
the action or condition has been corrected.

(e) If a private college or university is under a sanction from its
accrediting body at the time that it submits its
application for reauthorization, the director may:

(1) Approve the private college or university's
reauthorization; or

(2) Grant probationary approval of the private
college or university's reauthorization; provided that if the private college
or university is granted probationary reauthorization:

(A) The department shall provide the private
college or university with written notice of its probationary status;

(B) The private college or university shall
reapply for reauthorization on an annual basis until the accrediting body lifts
its sanction; and

(C) The private college or university shall
provide the department with an annual report on its progress toward removing
the sanction. [L 2013, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next